Utah, session 2026, SB215.
Section 1. Section 78B-6-852 is amended to read:78B-6-852. Automatic expungement of eviction.(1)(a)Without the filing of a petition, a court shall order expungement of all records of an eviction if:(i)(a)(i)the entire case was dismissed;(ii)there is no appeal pending for the case; and(iii)at least three years90 days haveone year has passed from the day on which the eviction was fileddismissed; or(b)the parties to the eviction stipulated to expungement and have filed a stipulation with the court.(2)The court shall issue an order of expungement when the court determines that an eviction qualifies for automatic expungement under Subsection (1).(3)This section applies to evictions filed on or after July 1, 2022.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.